Hawaii, session 2025, SB696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the absence of tax incentives for home fortification, grants for low-income families to strengthen their homes, and efforts to create and enhance hurricane shelter capacity stems from a lack of a unified approach to securing funds and dedicated personnel to plan and manage such initiatives. Currently, the Hawaii emergency management agency is primarily focused on post-disaster response efforts for events such as hurricanes, tsunamis, or fires.  The legislature believes that the State has an obligation to provide sufficient funding and resources to ensure that residents of the State are thoroughly prepared for a natural disaster. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the office of the governor, in collaboration with the insurance division of the department of commerce and consumer affairs, to: (1)  Plan and administer: (A)  Income tax credits relating to emergency management or disaster preparedness; and (B)  Grants for low-income taxpayers to fortify their residential real property; (2)  Oversee the increase of emergency shelters; and (3)  Hire necessary personnel. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of the governor, in collaboration with the insurance division of the department of commerce and consumer affairs, to: (1)  Plan and administer: (A)  Any income tax credits relating to emergency management or disaster preparedness; and (B)  Grants for low-income taxpayers making eighty per cent or less of the area median income to fortify their residential real property; (2)  Oversee the development of emergency shelters, including hurricane and tsunami shelters; and (3)  Hire personnel as needed to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of the governor for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________